Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.409

Transfer of ownership of a city or town-owned vessel—Further requirements.

(1) Following the inspection required under RCW 35.21.408 and prior to transferring ownership of a city or town-owned vessel, a city or town shall obtain the following from the transferee:

(a) The purposes for which the transferee intends to use the vessel; and

(b) Information demonstrating the prospective owner's intent to obtain legal moorage following the transfer, in the manner determined by the city or town.

(2)(a) The city or town shall remove any containers or other materials that are not fixed to the vessel and contain hazardous substances, as defined under RCW 70A.305.020.

(b) However, the city or town may transfer a vessel with:

(i) Those containers or materials described under (a) of this subsection where the transferee demonstrates to the city or town's satisfaction that the container's or material's presence is consistent with the anticipated use of the vessel; and

(ii) A reasonable amount of fuel as determined by the city or town, based on factors including the vessel's size, condition, and anticipated use of the vessel, including initial destination following transfer.

(c) The city or town may consult with the department of ecology in carrying out the requirements of this subsection.

(3) Prior to sale, and unless the vessel has a title or valid marine document, the city or town is required to apply for a certificate of title for the vessel under RCW 88.02.510 and register the vessel under RCW 88.02.550.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1010; 2013 c 291 s 16.]